Illinois, session 104th, HB4600.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Health Care 5at Home Workforce Protection Act. 6    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 7changing Sections 12-0.1, 12-2, and 12-3.05 and by adding 8Section 12-9.5 as follows: 9    (720 ILCS 5/12-0.1)10    Sec. 12-0.1. Definitions. In this Article, unless the 11context clearly requires otherwise:12    "Bona fide labor dispute" means any controversy concerning 13wages, salaries, hours, working conditions, or benefits, 14including health and welfare, sick leave, insurance, and 15pension or retirement provisions, the making or maintaining of 16collective bargaining agreements, and the terms to be included 17in those agreements.18    "Coach" means a person recognized as a coach by the 19sanctioning authority that conducts an athletic contest.20    "Correctional institution employee" means a person 21employed by a penal institution.22    "Emergency medical services personnel" has the meaning   HB4600- 2 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1specified in Section 3.5 of the Emergency Medical Services 2(EMS) Systems Act and shall include all ambulance crew 3members, including drivers or pilots.4    "Family or household members" include spouses, former 5spouses, parents, children, stepchildren, and other persons 6related by blood or by present or prior marriage, persons who 7share or formerly shared a common dwelling, persons who have 8or allegedly have a child in common, persons who share or 9allegedly share a blood relationship through a child, persons 10who have or have had a dating or engagement relationship, 11persons with disabilities and their personal assistants, and 12caregivers as defined in Section 12-4.4a of this Code. For 13purposes of this Article, neither a casual acquaintanceship 14nor ordinary fraternization between 2 individuals in business 15or social contexts shall be deemed to constitute a dating 16relationship.17    "Health care at home provider" means any employee or 18volunteer of an Illinois licensed hospice or home health 19program or a home nursing provider. 20    "In the presence of a child" means in the physical 21presence of a child or knowing or having reason to know that a 22child is present and may see or hear an act constituting an 23offense.24    "Park district employee" means a supervisor, director, 25instructor, or other person employed by a park district.26    "Person with a physical disability" means a person who   HB4600- 3 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1suffers from a permanent and disabling physical 2characteristic, resulting from disease, injury, functional 3disorder, or congenital condition.4    "Private security officer" means a registered employee of 5a private security contractor agency under the Private 6Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint 7Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004.8    "Probation officer" means a person as defined in the 9Probation and Probation Officers Act. 10    "Sports official" means a person at an athletic contest 11who enforces the rules of the contest, such as an umpire or 12referee.13    "Sports venue" means a publicly or privately owned sports 14or entertainment arena, stadium, community or convention hall, 15special event center, or amusement facility, or a special 16event center in a public park, during the 12 hours before or 17after the sanctioned sporting event.18    "Streetgang", "streetgang member", and "criminal street 19gang" have the meanings ascribed to those terms in Section 10 20of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act.21    "Transit employee" means a driver, operator, or employee 22of any transportation facility or system engaged in the 23business of transporting the public for hire.24    "Transit passenger" means a passenger of any 25transportation facility or system engaged in the business of 26transporting the public for hire, including a passenger using   HB4600- 4 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1any area designated by a transportation facility or system as 2a vehicle boarding, departure, or transfer location.3    "Utility worker" means any of the following:4        (1) A person employed by a public utility as defined 5    in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act.6        (2) An employee of a municipally owned utility.7        (3) An employee of a cable television company.8        (4) An employee of an electric cooperative as defined 9    in Section 3-119 of the Public Utilities Act.10        (5) An independent contractor or an employee of an 11    independent contractor working on behalf of a cable 12    television company, public utility, municipally owned 13    utility, or electric cooperative.14        (6) An employee of a telecommunications carrier as 15    defined in Section 13-202 of the Public Utilities Act, or 16    an independent contractor or an employee of an independent 17    contractor working on behalf of a telecommunications 18    carrier.19        (7) An employee of a telephone or telecommunications 20    cooperative as defined in Section 13-212 of the Public 21    Utilities Act, or an independent contractor or an employee 22    of an independent contractor working on behalf of a 23    telephone or telecommunications cooperative.24(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15; 99-816, eff. 8-15-16.) 25    (720 ILCS 5/12-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 12-2)  HB4600- 5 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1    Sec. 12-2. Aggravated assault. 2    (a) Offense based on location of conduct. A person commits 3aggravated assault when he or she commits an assault against 4an individual who is on or about a public way, public property, 5a public place of accommodation or amusement, or a sports 6venue, or in a church, synagogue, mosque, or other building, 7structure, or place used for religious worship.8    (b) Offense based on status of victim. A person commits 9aggravated assault when, in committing an assault, he or she 10knows the individual assaulted to be any of the following:11        (1) A person with a physical disability or a person 60 12    years of age or older and the assault is without legal 13    justification.14        (2) A teacher or school employee upon school grounds 15    or grounds adjacent to a school or in any part of a 16    building used for school purposes.17        (3) A park district employee upon park grounds or 18    grounds adjacent to a park or in any part of a building 19    used for park purposes.20        (4) A community policing volunteer, private security 21    officer, or utility worker:22            (i) performing his or her official duties;23            (ii) assaulted to prevent performance of his or 24        her official duties; or25            (iii) assaulted in retaliation for performing his 26        or her official duties.  HB4600- 6 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1        (4.1) A peace officer, fireman, emergency management 2    worker, or emergency medical services personnel:3            (i) performing his or her official duties;4            (ii) assaulted to prevent performance of his or 5        her official duties; or6            (iii) assaulted in retaliation for performing his 7        or her official duties. 8        (5) A correctional officer or probation officer:9            (i) performing his or her official duties;10            (ii) assaulted to prevent performance of his or 11        her official duties; or12            (iii) assaulted in retaliation for performing his 13        or her official duties.14        (6) A correctional institution employee, a county 15    juvenile detention center employee who provides direct and 16    continuous supervision of residents of a juvenile 17    detention center, including a county juvenile detention 18    center employee who supervises recreational activity for 19    residents of a juvenile detention center, or a Department 20    of Human Services employee, Department of Human Services 21    officer, or employee of a subcontractor of the Department 22    of Human Services supervising or controlling sexually 23    dangerous persons or sexually violent persons:24            (i) performing his or her official duties;25            (ii) assaulted to prevent performance of his or 26        her official duties; or  HB4600- 7 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1            (iii) assaulted in retaliation for performing his 2        or her official duties.3        (7) An employee of the State of Illinois, a municipal 4    corporation therein, or a political subdivision thereof, 5    performing his or her official duties.6        (8) A transit employee performing his or her official 7    duties, or a transit passenger.8        (9) A sports official or coach actively participating 9    in any level of athletic competition within a sports 10    venue, on an indoor playing field or outdoor playing 11    field, or within the immediate vicinity of such a facility 12    or field.13        (10) A person authorized to serve process under 14    Section 2-202 of the Code of Civil Procedure or a special 15    process server appointed by the circuit court, while that 16    individual is in the performance of his or her duties as a 17    process server. 18        (11) A health care at home provider or the health care 19    at home provider's family or household members under all 20    of the following circumstances:21            (A) the conduct is in response to an action by the 22        health care at home provider acting in his or her 23        capacity as a health care at home provider or because 24        of the health care at home provider's professional or 25        employment status;26            (B) there is no consent by the person harmed or   HB4600- 8 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1        threatened by the conduct; and2            (C) the conduct includes specific facts indicative 3        of a unique threat to or action against the health care 4        at home provider or his or her immediate family and not 5        a generalized threat of harm. 6    (c) Offense based on use of firearm, device, or motor 7vehicle. A person commits aggravated assault when, in 8committing an assault, he or she does any of the following:9        (1) Uses a deadly weapon, an air rifle as defined in 10    Section 24.8-0.1 of this Act, or any device manufactured 11    and designed to be substantially similar in appearance to 12    a firearm, other than by discharging a firearm.13        (2) Discharges a firearm, other than from a motor 14    vehicle.15        (3) Discharges a firearm from a motor vehicle.16        (4) Wears a hood, robe, or mask to conceal his or her 17    identity.18        (5) Knowingly and without lawful justification shines 19    or flashes a laser gun sight or other laser device 20    attached to a firearm, or used in concert with a firearm, 21    so that the laser beam strikes near or in the immediate 22    vicinity of any person.23        (6) Uses a firearm, other than by discharging the 24    firearm, against a peace officer, community policing 25    volunteer, fireman, private security officer, emergency 26    management worker, emergency medical services personnel,   HB4600- 9 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1    employee of a police department, employee of a sheriff's 2    department, or traffic control municipal employee:3            (i) performing his or her official duties;4            (ii) assaulted to prevent performance of his or 5        her official duties; or6            (iii) assaulted in retaliation for performing his 7        or her official duties. 8        (7) Without justification operates a motor vehicle in 9    a manner which places a person, other than a person listed 10    in subdivision (b)(4), in reasonable apprehension of being 11    struck by the moving motor vehicle.12        (8) Without justification operates a motor vehicle in 13    a manner which places a person listed in subdivision 14    (b)(4), in reasonable apprehension of being struck by the 15    moving motor vehicle. 16        (9) Knowingly video or audio records the offense with 17    the intent to disseminate the recording. 18    (d) Sentence. Aggravated assault as defined in subdivision 19(a), (b)(1), (b)(2), (b)(3), (b)(4), (b)(7), (b)(8), (b)(9), 20(c)(1), (c)(4), or (c)(9) is a Class A misdemeanor, except 21that aggravated assault as defined in subdivision (b)(4) and 22(b)(7) is a Class 4 felony if a Category I, Category II, or 23Category III weapon is used in the commission of the assault. 24Aggravated assault as defined in subdivision (b)(4.1), (b)(5), 25(b)(6), (b)(10), (b)(11), (c)(2), (c)(5), (c)(6), or (c)(7) is 26a Class 4 felony. Aggravated assault as defined in subdivision   HB4600- 10 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1(c)(3) or (c)(8) is a Class 3 felony.2    (e) For the purposes of this Section, "Category I weapon", 3"Category II weapon", and "Category III weapon" have the 4meanings ascribed to those terms in Section 33A-1 of this 5Code. 6(Source: P.A. 101-223, eff. 1-1-20; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 7    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.05)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-4)8    Sec. 12-3.05. Aggravated battery. 9    (a) Offense based on injury. A person commits aggravated 10battery when, in committing a battery, other than by the 11discharge of a firearm, he or she knowingly does any of the 12following:13        (1) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 14    or disfigurement.15        (2) Causes severe and permanent disability, great 16    bodily harm, or disfigurement by means of a caustic or 17    flammable substance, a poisonous gas, a deadly biological 18    or chemical contaminant or agent, a radioactive substance, 19    or a bomb or explosive compound.20        (3) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 21    or disfigurement to an individual whom the person knows to 22    be a peace officer, community policing volunteer, fireman, 23    private security officer, correctional institution 24    employee, or Department of Human Services employee 25    supervising or controlling sexually dangerous persons or   HB4600- 11 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1    sexually violent persons:2            (i) performing his or her official duties;3            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 4        official duties; or5            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 6        or her official duties.7        (4) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 8    or disfigurement to an individual 60 years of age or 9    older.10        (5) Strangles another individual. 11    (b) Offense based on injury to a child or person with an 12intellectual disability. A person who is at least 18 years of 13age commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, 14he or she knowingly and without legal justification by any 15means:16        (1) causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 17    or disfigurement to any child under the age of 13 years, or 18    to any person with a severe or profound intellectual 19    disability; or20        (2) causes bodily harm or disability or disfigurement 21    to any child under the age of 13 years or to any person 22    with a severe or profound intellectual disability. 23    (c) Offense based on location of conduct. A person commits 24aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 25by the discharge of a firearm, he or she is or the person 26battered is on or about a public way, public property, a public   HB4600- 12 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1place of accommodation or amusement, a sports venue, or a 2domestic violence shelter, or in a church, synagogue, mosque, 3or other building, structure, or place used for religious 4worship.5    (d) Offense based on status of victim. A person commits 6aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 7by discharge of a firearm, he or she knows the individual 8battered to be any of the following:9        (1) A person 60 years of age or older.10        (2) A person who is pregnant or has a physical 11    disability.12        (3) A teacher or school employee upon school grounds 13    or grounds adjacent to a school or in any part of a 14    building used for school purposes.15        (4) A peace officer, community policing volunteer, 16    fireman, private security officer, correctional 17    institution employee, or Department of Human Services 18    employee supervising or controlling sexually dangerous 19    persons or sexually violent persons:20            (i) performing his or her official duties;21            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 22        official duties; or23            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 24        or her official duties.25        (5) A judge, emergency management worker, emergency 26    medical services personnel, or utility worker:  HB4600- 13 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1            (i) performing his or her official duties;2            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 3        official duties; or4            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 5        or her official duties.6        (6) An officer or employee of the State of Illinois, a 7    unit of local government, or a school district, while 8    performing his or her official duties.9        (7) A transit employee performing his or her official 10    duties, or a transit passenger.11        (8) A taxi driver on duty.12        (9) A merchant who detains the person for an alleged 13    commission of retail theft under Section 16-26 of this 14    Code and the person without legal justification by any 15    means causes bodily harm to the merchant.16        (10) A person authorized to serve process under 17    Section 2-202 of the Code of Civil Procedure or a special 18    process server appointed by the circuit court while that 19    individual is in the performance of his or her duties as a 20    process server.21        (11) A nurse while in the performance of his or her 22    duties as a nurse. 23        (12) A merchant: (i) while performing his or her 24    duties, including, but not limited to, relaying directions 25    for healthcare or safety from his or her supervisor or 26    employer or relaying health or safety guidelines,   HB4600- 14 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1    recommendations, regulations, or rules from a federal, 2    State, or local public health agency; and (ii) during a 3    disaster declared by the Governor, or a state of emergency 4    declared by the mayor of the municipality in which the 5    merchant is located, due to a public health emergency and 6    for a period of 6 months after such declaration.7        (13) A health care at home provider or the health care 8    at home provider's family or household members under all 9    of the following circumstances:10            (A) the act is in response to an action by the 11        health care at home provider acting in his or her 12        capacity as a health care at home provider or because 13        of the health care at home provider's professional or 14        employment status; and15            (B) there is no consent by the person harmed. 16    (e) Offense based on use of a firearm. A person commits 17aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he or she 18knowingly does any of the following:19        (1) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 20    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 21    to another person.22        (2) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 23    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 24    to a person he or she knows to be a peace officer, 25    community policing volunteer, person summoned by a police 26    officer, fireman, private security officer, correctional   HB4600- 15 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1    institution employee, or emergency management worker:2            (i) performing his or her official duties;3            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 4        official duties; or5            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 6        or her official duties.7        (3) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 8    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 9    to a person he or she knows to be emergency medical 10    services personnel:11            (i) performing his or her official duties;12            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 13        official duties; or14            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 15        or her official duties.16        (4) Discharges a firearm and causes any injury to a 17    person he or she knows to be a teacher, a student in a 18    school, or a school employee, and the teacher, student, or 19    employee is upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a 20    school or in any part of a building used for school 21    purposes.22        (5) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 23    with a silencer, and causes any injury to another person.24        (6) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 25    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 26    she knows to be a peace officer, community policing   HB4600- 16 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1    volunteer, person summoned by a police officer, fireman, 2    private security officer, correctional institution 3    employee or emergency management worker:4            (i) performing his or her official duties;5            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 6        official duties; or7            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 8        or her official duties.9        (7) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 10    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 11    she knows to be emergency medical services personnel:12            (i) performing his or her official duties;13            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 14        official duties; or15            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 16        or her official duties.17        (8) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 18    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 19    she knows to be a teacher, or a student in a school, or a 20    school employee, and the teacher, student, or employee is 21    upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a school or in 22    any part of a building used for school purposes. 23    (f) Offense based on use of a weapon or device. A person 24commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he 25or she does any of the following:26        (1) Uses a deadly weapon other than by discharge of a   HB4600- 17 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1    firearm, or uses an air rifle as defined in Section 2    24.8-0.1 of this Code.3        (2) Wears a hood, robe, or mask to conceal his or her 4    identity.5        (3) Knowingly and without lawful justification shines 6    or flashes a laser gunsight or other laser device attached 7    to a firearm, or used in concert with a firearm, so that 8    the laser beam strikes upon or against the person of 9    another.10        (4) Knowingly video or audio records the offense with 11    the intent to disseminate the recording. 12    (g) Offense based on certain conduct. A person commits 13aggravated battery when, other than by discharge of a firearm, 14he or she does any of the following:15        (1) Violates Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled 16    Substances Act by unlawfully delivering a controlled 17    substance to another and any user experiences great bodily 18    harm or permanent disability as a result of the injection, 19    inhalation, or ingestion of any amount of the controlled 20    substance.21        (2) Knowingly administers to an individual or causes 22    him or her to take, without his or her consent or by threat 23    or deception, and for other than medical purposes, any 24    intoxicating, poisonous, stupefying, narcotic, 25    anesthetic, or controlled substance, or gives to another 26    person any food containing any substance or object   HB4600- 18 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1    intended to cause physical injury if eaten.2        (3) Knowingly causes or attempts to cause a 3    correctional institution employee or Department of Human 4    Services employee to come into contact with blood, seminal 5    fluid, urine, or feces by throwing, tossing, or expelling 6    the fluid or material, and the person is an inmate of a 7    penal institution or is a sexually dangerous person or 8    sexually violent person in the custody of the Department 9    of Human Services.10    (h) Sentence. Unless otherwise provided, aggravated 11battery is a Class 3 felony.12    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(4), 13(d)(4), or (g)(3) is a Class 2 felony.14    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(3) or 15(g)(1) is a Class 1 felony.16    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 17Class 1 felony when the aggravated battery was intentional and 18involved the infliction of torture, as defined in paragraph 19(10) of subsection (b-5) of Section 5-8-1 of the Unified Code 20of Corrections, as the infliction of or subjection to extreme 21physical pain, motivated by an intent to increase or prolong 22the pain, suffering, or agony of the victim. 23    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 24Class 2 felony when the person causes great bodily harm or 25permanent disability to an individual whom the person knows to 26be a member of a congregation engaged in prayer or other   HB4600- 19 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1religious activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or other 2building, structure, or place used for religious worship. 3    Aggravated battery under subdivision (a)(5) is a Class 1 4felony if:5        (A) the person used or attempted to use a dangerous 6    instrument while committing the offense;7        (B) the person caused great bodily harm or permanent 8    disability or disfigurement to the other person while 9    committing the offense; or10        (C) the person has been previously convicted of a 11    violation of subdivision (a)(5) under the laws of this 12    State or laws similar to subdivision (a)(5) of any other 13    state. 14    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(1) is a 15Class X felony.16    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(2) is a 17Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 18of imprisonment of a minimum of 6 years and a maximum of 45 19years.20    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(5) is a 21Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 22of imprisonment of a minimum of 12 years and a maximum of 45 23years.24    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(2), 25(e)(3), or (e)(4) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 26be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 15 years   HB4600- 20 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1and a maximum of 60 years.2    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(6), 3(e)(7), or (e)(8) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 4be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 20 years 5and a maximum of 60 years.6    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (b)(1) is a 7Class X felony, except that:8        (1) if the person committed the offense while armed 9    with a firearm, 15 years shall be added to the term of 10    imprisonment imposed by the court;11        (2) if, during the commission of the offense, the 12    person personally discharged a firearm, 20 years shall be 13    added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court;14        (3) if, during the commission of the offense, the 15    person personally discharged a firearm that proximately 16    caused great bodily harm, permanent disability, permanent 17    disfigurement, or death to another person, 25 years or up 18    to a term of natural life shall be added to the term of 19    imprisonment imposed by the court.20    (i) Definitions. In this Section:21    "Building or other structure used to provide shelter" has 22the meaning ascribed to "shelter" in Section 1 of the Domestic 23Violence Shelters Act.24    "Domestic violence" has the meaning ascribed to it in 25Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.26    "Domestic violence shelter" means any building or other   HB4600- 21 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1structure used to provide shelter or other services to victims 2or to the dependent children of victims of domestic violence 3pursuant to the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 or the 4Domestic Violence Shelters Act, or any place within 500 feet 5of such a building or other structure in the case of a person 6who is going to or from such a building or other structure.7    "Firearm" has the meaning provided under Section 1.1 of 8the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, and does not 9include an air rifle as defined by Section 24.8-0.1 of this 10Code. 11    "Machine gun" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1224-1 of this Code.13    "Merchant" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1416-0.1 of this Code. 15    "Strangle" means intentionally impeding the normal 16breathing or circulation of the blood of an individual by 17applying pressure on the throat or neck of that individual or 18by blocking the nose or mouth of that individual. 19(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24.) 20    (720 ILCS 5/12-9.5 new)21    Sec. 12-9.5. Threatening health care at home providers.22    (a) A person commits threatening a health care at home 23provider when:24        (1) that person knowingly delivers or conveys, 25    directly or indirectly, to a health care at home provider   HB4600- 22 -LRB104 17676 RLC 31107 b1    by any means a communication containing a threat that 2    would place the health care at home provider or a member of 3    his or her immediate family in reasonable apprehension of 4    immediate or future bodily harm, sexual assault, 5    confinement, or restraint;6        (2) at the time of the threat, the person knows or 7    should have known that the victim is a health care at home 8    provider or is an immediate family member of a health care 9    at home provider;10        (3) the threat was conveyed because of an action taken 11    by the health care at home provider acting in his or her 12    employment or volunteer capacity or because of the 13    victim's professional or employment status;14        (4) there is no consent by the person threatened; and15        (5) the threat contains specific facts indicative of a 16    unique threat to the health care at home provider or his or 17    her immediate family and not a generalized threat of harm.18    (b) As used in this Section, "immediate family" means a 19health care at home provider's parent, spouse, sibling, child, 20stepchild, or foster child.21    (c) Sentence. Threatening a health care at home provider 22is a Class 4 felony for a first offense and a Class 3 felony 23for a second or subsequent offense.